Nebraska, session 109, LB166.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
Section 1. Section 23-3211, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
23-3211 (1) Unless requested in writing, the county assessor, and register
of deeds, and county treasurer shall withhold from the public the residential
address of a law enforcement officer, a member of the Nebraska National Guard
acting pursuant to subdivision (3) of section 55-182, or a judge who applies to
the county assessor in the county of his or her residence. The application
shall be in a form prescribed by the county assessor and shall include the
applicant's name and address and the parcel identification number for his or
her residential address. A law enforcement officer shall include in the
application his or her law enforcement identification number. A member of the
Nebraska National Guard shall include in the application proof of his or her
status as a member, in a manner prescribed by the county assessor. A judge
shall include in the application the name of the specific court of which he or
she is a judge. The county assessor shall notify the register of deeds and
county treasurer regarding the receipt of a complete application. The county
assessor, and the register of deeds, and county treasurer shall withhold the
address of a law enforcement officer, member of the Nebraska National Guard, or
judge who complies with this section for five years after receipt of a complete
application. The officer, member, or judge may renew his or her application
every five years upon submission of an updated application.
(2) For purposes of this section, judge includes the judge or magistrate
judge of any court located in this state, including any county court, any
district court, the Court of Appeals, the Nebraska Workers' Compensation Court,
any separate juvenile court, the Supreme Court, and any federal court.
Sec. 2. Section 24-814, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
24-814 (1) Any judicial officeholder, subject to the terms of sections
24-813 to 24-818, who desires to continue in office for an additional term,
shall indicate his or her desire in this respect in writing filed with the
Secretary of State, on or before August 1 immediately preceding the expiration
of his or her term in office, and shall request in writing that the Secretary
of State submit to the electorate of the appropriate district or area, the
question of his or her right to be retained in office for an additional term.
(2) Any written request filed with the Secretary of State shall not be a
public record pursuant to section 84-712.01 and shall not be subject to
disclosure under sections 84-712 to 84-712.09 or any other provision of law,
except that the Secretary of State shall electronically publish a list, that
includes the judicial officeholder's name and respective district or area of
the state served, of judicial officeholders who have filed for retention in
that calendar year.
Sec. 3. Section 32-607, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, is
amended to read:
32-607 (1)(a) All candidate filing forms shall contain the following
statement: I hereby swear that I will abide by the laws of the State of
Nebraska regarding the results of the primary and general elections, that I am
a registered voter and qualified to be elected, and that I will serve if
elected. Candidate filing forms shall also contain the following information
regarding the candidate: Name, as provided under subdivision (b) of this
subsection; residence address; mailing address if different from the residence
address; telephone number; office sought; party affiliation if the office
sought is a partisan office; a statement as to whether or not civil penalties
are owed pursuant to the Nebraska Political Accountability and Disclosure Act;
and, if civil penalties are owed, whether or not a surety bond has been filed
pursuant to subdivision (4)(b) of section 32-602. An email address shall also
be included on the filing form as an optional field.
(b) The name contained on a candidate filing form shall be the name by
which the candidate is generally known in the community and by which the
candidate is distinguished from others and shall not contain titles,
characterizations, or designations.
(2) Candidate filing forms shall be filed with the following filing
officers:
(a) For candidates for national, state, or congressional office, directors
-1-

LB166 LB166
2025 2025
of public power and irrigation districts, directors of reclamation districts,
directors of natural resources districts, directors of metropolitan utilities
districts, members of the boards of educational service units, members of
governing boards of community colleges, delegates to national conventions, and
other offices filled by election held in more than one county and judges
desiring retention, in the office of the Secretary of State;
(b) For officers elected within a county, in the office of the election
commissioner or county clerk;
(c) For officers in school districts which include land in adjoining
counties, in the office of the election commissioner or county clerk of the
county in which the greatest number of registered voters entitled to vote for
the officers reside; and
(d) For city or village officers, in the office of the election
commissioner or county clerk.
(3) Objections to the name of a candidate submitted on a candidate filing
form may be made and passed upon in the same manner as objections to a
candidate filing form pursuant to section 32-624.
Sec. 4. Original sections 23-3211 and 24-814, Reissue Revised Statutes of
Nebraska, and section 32-607, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, are
repealed.
-2-